Washington statutes.
RCW 18.110.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Art dealer" means a person, partnership, firm, association, or corporation, other than a public auctioneer, which undertakes to sell a work of fine art created by another.

(2) "Artist" means the creator of a work of fine art.

(3) "On consignment" means delivered to an art dealer for the purpose of sale or exhibition, or both, to the public by the art dealer other than at a public auction.

(4) "Work of fine art" means an original art work which is:

(a) A visual rendition including a painting, drawing, sculpture, mosaic, or photograph;

(b) A work of calligraphy;

(c) A work of graphic art including an etching, lithograph, offset print, or silk screen;

(d) A craft work in materials including clay, textile, fiber, wood, metal, plastic, or glass; or

(e) A work in mixed media including a collage or a work consisting of any combination of works included in this subsection.

[ 1981 c 33 s 1.]